Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.20.060

Duties of attorney general. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

The attorney general, through his or her office, shall provide assistance as required by the commission to carry out its responsibilities under this title. The commission may employ attorneys who are neither the attorney general nor an assistant attorney general to carry out any function of the attorney general prescribed in this title.

[ 2024 c 164 s 412. Prior: 2010 c 205 s 8; 2010 c 204 s 306; 1982 c 35 s 196; 1975 1st ex.s. c 294 s 26; 1973 c 1 s 38 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.130, 42.17.380.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.